Ohio, session 136, HB290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 2917.43 of the Revised Code be 6
enacted to read as follows: 7
Sec. 2917.43. (A) As used in this section : 8
(1) "Cloud seeding" means a form of weather modification 9
where a pollutant is released into clouds to induce or enhance 10
precipitation. 11
(2) "Marine cloud brightening" means enhancing the 12
reflectivity of low-lying marine clouds to reflect more 13
sunlight. 14
(3) "Pollutant" means any aerosol; biologic, 15
transbiologic, or genetically modified agent; chaff; metal; 16
radioactive material; acid; alkali; chemical; particulate; 17
contaminant; smart dust; smoke; soot; fume; vapor; air pollutant 18

H. B. No. 290 Page 2
As Introduced
regulated by this state; mechanical vibration or other physical 19
agent; waste, including materials that may be recycled, 20
reconditioned, or reclaimed; solid, liquid, gaseous, or thermal 21
irritant; or artificially produced electric field, magnetic 22
field, electromagnetic field, electromagnetic pulse, sound wave, 23
sound pollution, light pollution, microwave, or ionizing or non- 24
ionizing radiation. 25
(4) "Solar radiation modification" means an experiment in 26
the earth's climatic system involving the release of pollutants 27
that reduces the amount of sunlight absorbed by the earth, 28
including through marine cloud brightening, space-based 29
reflectors, or stratospheric aerosol injection. 30
(5) "Space-based reflectors" means deploying mirrors or 31
other reflective objects in space to deflect sunlight. 32
(6) "Stratospheric aerosol injection" means introducing 33
reflective particles into the stratosphere to reflect sunlight. 34
(B) No person or entity shall engage in solar radiation 35
modification, cloud seeding, or sunlight reflection methods in 36
this state, including through the use of an aircraft, balloon, 37
drone, space-based platform, or interoperable ground-based 38
facility. 39
(C) The superintendent of the state highway patrol or a 40
county sheriff shall issue a cease-and-desist order to a person 41
who the superintendent or sheriff determines is conducting or 42
attempting to conduct solar radiation modification, cloud 43
seeding, or sunlight reflection methods. No person shall fail to 44
comply with a cease and desist order issued under this division. 45
(D) A violation of this section is a strict liability 46
offense and section 2901.20 of the Revised Code does not apply. 47

H. B. No. 290 Page 3
As Introduced
(E) Whoever violates this section is guilty of a third 48
degree felony and the court shall impose a mandatory prison term 49
of thirty-six months on the offender and, notwithstanding 50
section 2929.18 of the Revised Code, a fine of not less than 51
five hundred thousand dollars. 52
Section 2. This act shall be known as the Atmosphere 53
Protection Act. 54